Utah statutes.
59-14-707.   Commission rulemaking authority.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may make rules to verify information for purposes of granting or denying a certification or renewal of certification under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 148, 2013 General Session

